foma/backups/sakha_1.foma
###sakha.foma###

define BackVNonLab [ а  | а а  | ы  | ы ы  | ы а  ];
define FrontVNonLab [ э  | э э  | и  | и и  | и э  ];
define FrontHighVLab [ ү  | ү ү  | ү ө  ];
define FrontLowVLab [ ө  | ө ө  ];
define BackHighVLab [ у  | у у  | у о  ];
define BackLowVLab [ о  | о о  ];
define Vowel [ а  | а а  | ы  | ы ы  | ы а  | э  | э э  | и  | и и  | и э  | ү  | ү ү  | ү ө  | ө  | ө ө  | у  | у у  | у о  | о  | о о  ];
define Consonant [ б  | в  | г  | ҕ  | д  | д ь  | ж  | з  | й  | к  | л  | м  | н  | ҥ  | н ь  | п  | р  | с  | һ  | т  | ф  | х  | ц  | ч  | ш  | щ  | ъ  | ь  ];
define VoicelessConsSome [ к  | п  | с  | т  | ф  | х  | ц  | ч  ];
define VoicedCons [ б  | в  | г  | ҕ  | д  | д ь  | ж  | з  | й  | р  ];

define EndsCons 0 -> @P.EndsCons.ON@ || Consonant _ .#. ;

define CaseAcc ы  -> н ы  || Vowel "^" _ "^" ;

define CaseAbl т а н  -> т т а н  || Vowel "^" _ "^" ;

define CaseIns н а н  -> ы н а н  || Consonant "^" _ "^" ;

define PossOneSG м  -> ы м  || Consonant "^" _ "^" ;

define PossTwoSG ҥ  -> ы ҥ  || Consonant "^" _ "^" ;

define PossThreeSG а  -> т а  || Vowel "^" _ "^" ;

define PossThreePL "^"  л а р  "^"  л а р а  -> "^"  л а р а  ;

define NonLabFront а  -> э  , ы  -> и  , ы а  -> и э  || FrontVNonLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define NonLabBack э  -> а  , и  -> ы  , и э  -> ы а  || BackVNonLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabFrontHighFromBack а  -> э  , ы  -> ү  , ы а  -> ү ө  || FrontHighVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabFrontHighFromFront э  -> э  , и  -> ү  , и э  -> ү ө  || FrontHighVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabFrontLowFromBack а  -> ө  , ы  -> ү  , ы а  -> ү ө  || FrontLowVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabFrontLowFromFront э  -> ө  , и  -> ү  , и э  -> ү ө  || FrontLowVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabBackHighFromBack а  -> а  , ы  -> у  , ы а  -> у о  || BackHighVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabBackHighFromFront э  -> а  , и  -> у  , и э  -> у о  || BackHighVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabBackLowFromBack а  -> о  , ы  -> у  , ы а  -> у о  || BackLowVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define LabBackLowFromFront э  -> о  , и  -> у  , и э  -> у о  || BackLowVLab Consonant* "^" [? - "^"]* _  ;

define Voicing к  -> г  , п  -> б  , с  -> һ  , х  -> ҕ  , т  -> д  ||  _ "^" Vowel ;

define VoicingPostCons к  -> г  , п  -> б  , с  -> һ  , х  -> ҕ  , т  -> д  , ч  -> д ь  || VoicedCons "^" _  ;

define Devoicing г  -> к  , б  -> п  , һ  -> с  , ҕ  -> х  || [к | п | с | х] "^" _  ;

define NasalCH ч  -> н ь  || [ҥ | м | н] "^" _  ;

define VoicedCH ч  -> д ь  || й _  ;

define NasalB б  -> м  || ҥ "^" _  ;

define NasalBAssimN н  "^"  б  -> м  "^"  м  ;

define DevoicedBAssimN т  "^"  б  -> п  "^"  п  ;

define NasalL л  -> н  || [ҥ | м | н] "^" _  ;

define DevoicedGHColloquial ҕ  -> х  || й _  ;

define PlosiveGH ҕ  -> г  || [ы | у | и | ү | й | л | р] "^" _  ;

define NasalGH ҕ  -> ҥ  || н "^" _  ;

define NasalGHAssimN н  "^"  ҕ  -> ҥ  "^"  ҥ  ;

define PlosiveGHAssimT т  "^"  ҕ  -> к  "^"  к  ;

define DevoicedGH ҕ  -> х  || х "^" _  ;

define DevoicedB б  -> п  || VoicelessConsSome "^" _  ;

define DevoicedL л  -> т  || VoicelessConsSome "^" _  ;

define PlosiveL л  -> д  || [й | р] "^" _  ;

define AssimilatedGHdevoiced ҕ  -> к  || VoicelessConsSome "^" _  ;

define DeleteStemPart т  -> 0  , п  -> 0  , к  -> 0  || л  "^"  _ п  , м  "^"  _ к  , ҥ  "^"  _ п  , ҥ  "^"  _ т  ;

define AssimilationCHIncosistent с ч  -> ч ч  , т ч  -> ч ч  ;

define Cleanup "^" -> "^";



define OrthWord [Consonant* Vowel Consonant*]+;
read lexc sakha.lexc
substitute defined OrthWord	for "^NOUNGUESS"
define Lexicon;


define Harmony NonLabFront .o.
NonLabBack .o.
LabFrontHighFromBack .o.
LabFrontHighFromFront .o.
LabFrontLowFromBack .o.
LabFrontLowFromFront .o.
LabBackHighFromBack .o.
LabBackHighFromFront .o.
LabBackLowFromBack .o.
LabBackLowFromFront;


define Grammar Lexicon .o.
CaseAcc .o.
CaseAbl .o.
CaseIns .o.
PossOneSG .o.
PossTwoSG .o.
PossThreeSG .o.
PossThreePL .o.
Harmony .o.
Harmony .o.
Harmony .o.
Harmony .o.
Harmony .o.
Harmony .o.
Harmony .o.
Harmony .o.
Harmony .o.
Harmony .o.
Voicing .o.
VoicingPostCons .o.
Devoicing .o.
NasalCH .o.
VoicedCH .o.
NasalB .o.
NasalBAssimN .o.
DevoicedBAssimN .o.
NasalL .o.
DevoicedGHColloquial .o.
PlosiveGH .o.
NasalGH .o.
NasalGHAssimN .o.
PlosiveGHAssimT .o.
DevoicedGH .o.
DevoicedB .o.
DevoicedL .o.
PlosiveL .o.
AssimilatedGHdevoiced .o.
DeleteStemPart .o.
AssimilationCHIncosistent .o.
Cleanup;

#regex Grammar;
regex [~$["GUESS+"] .o. Grammar] .p. [$["GUESS+"] .o. Grammar];
